zh-CN: 箱包收纳功能: 可调隔板; 弓形支托; 内置隔层; 透明视窗; 弹性带; 外置多个口袋; 衣物网眼收纳袋; 悬挂式洗漱用品; 隐藏式口袋; 保温瓶袋; 钥匙扣架; 笔记本电脑隔层; 木槌架; 防护套; 可拆卸小袋; 乐谱袋; 单隔间; 水瓶架; 其他
es: Características de almacenamiento de la bolsa/caja: Divisores regulables; Soportes de arcos; Compartimentos incorporados; Ventana transparente; Bucles elásticos; Bolsillos externos; Malla para trajes; Tocador colgante; Bolsillos ocultos; Bolsillo aislado para botella; Soporte para llavero; Compartimento para portátil; Sujetadores para mazos; Fundas protectoras; Bolsillo extraíble; Bolsillo para partituras; Compartimento único; Soporte para botella de agua; Otros
ko: 가방/케이스 수납 기능: 조절식 칸막이; 활 홀더; 내장 수납공간; 투명 창문; 신축성 있는 고리; 외부 포켓; 의류 메쉬; 걸이식 세면도구; 히든 포켓; 단열 보틀 포켓; 키체인 홀더; 노트북 수납공간; 망치 홀더; 보호용 슬리브; 탈착형 파우치; 악보 포켓; 단일 구획; 물병 홀더; 기타
sl-SI: Funkcije za shranjevanje v torbi/etuiju: Nastavljive pregrade; Držala za loke; Vgrajeni predelki; Čisto okno; Elastične zanke; Zunanji žepi; Mreža za oblačila; Viseči toaletni pribor; Skriti žepi; Izoliran žep za steklenice; Držalo za obeske za ključe; Predal za prenosni računalnik; Držala za kladivo; Zaščitni rokavi; Odstranljiva torbica; Žep za notne zapise; Enoprekatno; Držalo za bidon; Drugo
hr-HR: Značajke torbe/etuija vezane za pohranu: Podesivi razdjelnici; Držači za luk; Ugrađeni pretinci; Prozirni prozor; Elastične petlje; Vanjski džepovi; Mrežasta vreća za odjeću; Viseći toaletni pribor; Skriveni džepovi; Izolirani džep za bočice; Držač za ključeve; Pretinac za prijenosno računalo; Držači za batiće; Zaštitne vrećice; Uklonjiva torbica; Džep za notne zapise; Jedan pretinac; Držač za bocu; Ostalo
zh-TW: 袋/盒儲存功能: 隔板可調; 弓架; 內建隔間; 透明窗戶; 彈性環; 外部口袋; 衣物網袋; 懸掛式盥洗用品; 隱藏式口袋; 隔熱瓶袋; 鑰匙圈架; 筆電隔層; 木槌架; 防護套; 可拆式小袋; 樂譜夾; 單隔層; 水瓶架; 其他
de: Aufbewahrungsfunktionen in Tasche/Koffer: Verstellbare Trennwände; Bogenhalter; Eingebaute Fächer; Klarsichtfenster; Elastische Schlaufen; Außentaschen; Kleidernetz; Aufhängbarer Kulturbeutel; Versteckte Taschen; Isolierte Flaschentasche; Schlüsselanhänger; Laptopfach; Schlägelhalter; Schutzhüllen; Abnehmbarer Beutel; Notentasche; Einzelfach; Wasserflaschenhalter; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Функции за съхранение за чанта/куфар: Регулируеми разделители; Поставки за лъкове; Вградени отделения; Изчистване на прозорец; Еластични примки; Външни джобове; Мрежа за облекло; Висящи тоалетни принадлежности; Скрити джобове; Изолиран джоб за бутилка; Държач за ключодържател; Отделение за лаптоп; Държачи за чукове; Защитни ръкави; Подвижен калъф; Джоб за нотни листове; Едно отделение; Държач за бутилка за вода; Други
en: Bag/Case storage features: Adjustable dividers; Bow holders; Built-in compartments; Clear window; Elastic loops; External pockets; Garment mesh; Hanging toiletry; Hidden pockets; Insulated bottle pocket; Keychain holder; Laptop compartment; Mallet holders; Protective sleeves; Removable pouch; Sheet music pocket; Single compartment; Water bottle holder; Other
pt-BR: Recursos de armazenamento de bolsa/estojo: Divisórias ajustáveis; Porta-arcos; Compartimentos integrados; Janela transparente; Laços elásticos; Bolsos externos; Sacos de malha para proteger roupas; Porta artigos de higiene pessoal suspensos; Bolsos escondidos; Bolso térmico para garrafa; Porta-chaves; Compartimento para laptop; Suporte para baqueta maçaneta; Mangas protetoras; Bolsa removível; Bolso de partituras; Compartimento único; Suportes para garrafas de água; Outro
fi: Laukun/kotelon säilytysominaisuudet: Säädettävät jakajat; Jousen pidikkeet; Sisäänrakennetut lokerot; Läpinäkyvä aukko; Joustavat lenkit; Ulkoiset taskut; Vaatepussi; Ripustettava toilettilaukku; Piilotetut taskut; Eristetty pullotasku; Avaimenperän pidike; Kannettavan tietokoneen lokero; Malletti-telineet; Suojaavat taskut; Irrotettava pussi; Nuottitasku; Yksi osasto; Vesipullon pidike; Muu
it: Funzionalità di conservazione della borsa/custodia: Divisori regolabili; Portanastri; Scomparti incorporati; Panoramica chiara; Anelli elastici; Tasche esterne; Maglia per indumenti; Borse da bagno da appendere; Tasche nascoste; Tasca termica per bottiglia; Contenitore portachiavi; Scomparto per laptop; Porta mazze; Custodie protettive; Borsa rimovibile; Tasca per spartiti; Scomparto singolo; Contenitore portabottiglie; Altro
tr: Çanta/Kutu saklama özellikleri: Ayarlanabilir bölücüler; Fiyonk toka tutucuları; Dahili bölmeler; Transparan pencere; Elastik halkalar; Dış cepler; Giysi filesi; Asılabilir kozmetik çantası; Gizli cepler; Yalıtımlı şişe çantası; Anahtarlık tutucusu; Dizüstü bilgisayar bölmesi; Tokmak tutucuları; Koruyucu kollar; Çıkarılabilir kese; Nota çantası; Tek bölme; Su şişesi tutucusu; Diğer
nl: Opbergkenmerken tas/koffer: Verstelbare verdelers; Booghouders; Ingebouwde compartimenten; Transparant vak; Elastische lussen; Externe zakken; Kledingstuk gaas; Hangende toilettas; Verborgen zakken; Geïsoleerde flessenhouder; Sleutelhangerhouder; Laptopvak; Hamerhouders; Beschermende mouwen; Uitneembaar zakje; Vak voor bladmuziek; Enkel compartiment; Waterfleshouders; Andere
vi: Tính năng túi/hộp bảo quản: Điều chỉnh được vách chia; Hộp đựng nơ; Có ngăn trong; Khung trong suốt; Dây thun quấn; Có túi bên ngoài; Túi lưới quần áo; Treo đồ vệ sinh cá nhân; Túi ẩn; Túi đựng chai cách nhiệt; Chỗ để móc khóa; Ngăn đựng laptop; Chỗ cài vồ; Bao bảo vệ; Tháo rời được túi; Túi đựng bản nhạc; Ngăn đơn; Giá đế chai nước; Khác
sk-SK: Vlastnosti úložného priestoru tašky/kufríka: Nastaviteľné rozdeľovače; Držiaky sláku; Vstavané priehradky; Priehľadná stena; Elastické slučky; Vonkajšie vrecká; Sieťovina na odevy; Závesné toaletné potreby; Skryté vrecká; Izolované vrecko na fľašu; Držiak na kľúčenku; Priehradka na notebook; Držiaky paličiek; Ochranné poťahy; Odnímateľné vrecko; Vrecko na noty; Jedna priehradka; Držiak na fľašu s vodou; Iné
el: Λειτουργίες αποθήκευσης τσάντας/θήκης: Ρυθμιζόμενα διαχωριστικά; Βάσεις τόξου; Ενσωματωμένες θήκες; Διαφανές πλαίσιο; Ελαστικοί δακτύλιοι; Εξωτερικές τσέπες; Πλέγμα ρούχων; Νεσεσέρ; Κρυφές τσέπες; Μονωμένη τσέπη μπουκαλιού; Θήκη για μπρελόκ; Υποδοχή για φορητό υπολογιστή; Θήκες για σφύρα; Προστατευτικά περιβλήματα; Αφαιρούμενο τσαντάκι; Τσέπη για παρτιτούρες; Ενιαία υποδοχή; Θήκη για μπουκάλι νερού; Άλλο
hu: Táska/tok tárolási jellemzői: Állítható elválasztók; Íjtartók; Beépített rekeszek; Átlátszó; Elasztikus pántok; Külső zsebek; Hálós ruhatároló; Felfüggeszthető piperecikkek; Rejtett zsebek; Hőszigetelő palacktartó zseb; Kulcstartó; Laptoprekesz; Kalapácstartók; Védőtokok; Kivehető tasak; Kottatartó zseb; Egyetlen rekesz; Vizespalack-tartó; Egyéb
ru: Возможности для хранения в сумке или футляре: Регулируемые разделители; Держатели для лука; Встроенные отсеки; Прозрачное окошко; Эластичные петли; Внешние карманы; Органайзер для одежды; Подвес для туалетных принадлежностей; Скрытые карманы; Изолированный карман для бутылки; Держатель для брелка; Отделение для ноутбука; Держатели для молотка; Защитные рукава; Съемная сумка; Карман для нотных листов; Одно отделение; Держатель для бутылки; Другое
pt-PT: Características de armazenamento de bolsa/estojo: Divisórias ajustáveis; Porta-arcos; Compartimentos integrados; Janela transparente; Laços elásticos; Bolsos externos; Malha de vestuário; Artigos de higiene pessoal pendurados; Bolsos escondidos; Bolsos isolados para garrafas; Porta-chaves; Compartimento para portátil; Porta-marretas; Mangas protetoras; Bolsa removível; Bolso para partituras; Compartimento único; Suporte para garrafa de água; Outro
nb: Oppbevaringsfunksjoner for veske/eske: Regulerbare skillevegger; Sløyfeholdere; Innebygde rom; Gjennomsiktig vindu; Elastiske hemper; Utvendige lommer; Klesnetting; Hengende toalettvesker; Skjulte lommer; Isolert flaskelomme; Nøkkelringholder; Laptoplomme; Mallet-holder; Beskyttende ermer; Avtakbar lomme; Notelomme; Enkeltrom; Vannflaskeholder; Annet
sv: Detaljer för väsk-/fodralförvaring: Justerbara avdelare; Rosetthållare; Inbyggda fack; Klart fönster; Elastiska öglor; Utvändiga fickor; Nät för plagg; Hängande toalettartiklar; Dolda fickor; Isolerade flaskfickor; Nyckelringhållare; Laptopfack; Mallhållare; Skyddshylsor; Avtagbar påse; Notficka; Enkelt fack; Vattenflaskhållare; Övrigt
fr: Caractéristiques de rangement du sac/étui: Séparateurs réglables; Carquois; Compartiments intégrés; Fenêtre transparente; Boucles élastiques; Poches extérieures; Filet pour vêtements; Trousse de toilette suspendue; Poches cachées; Pochette isotherme pour bouteille; Porte-clés; Compartiment pour ordinateur portable; Porte-maillets; Manchons de protection; Pochette amovible; Poche à partitions; Compartiment unique; Support pour bouteille d’eau; Autre
ro-RO: Caracteristici depozitare geantă/cutie: Separatoare reglabile; Suporturi pentru arc de tir; Compartimente integrate; Fereastră transparentă; Benzi elastice; Buzunare exterioare; Plasă pentru îmbrăcăminte; Articole de toaletă suspendate; Buzunare ascunse; Buzunar izolat pentru sticlă; Suport breloc; Compartiment pentru laptop; Suporturi ciocănele de percuție; Manșoane de protecție; Organizator reutilizabil; Buzunar pentru partituri; Compartiment individual; Suport pentru sticla de apă; Altele
ja: バッグ/ケース収納機能: 調節可能な仕切り; 弓ホルダー; コンパートメント内蔵; クリアウィンドウ; 伸縮性ループ; 外側ポケット; ガーメントメッシュ; 吊り下げ式洗面用具; 隠しポケット; 断熱ボトルポケット; キーチェーンホルダー; ラップトップコンパートメント; マレットホルダー; 保護スリーブ; 取り外し可能なポーチ; 譜面用ポケット; シングルコンパートメント; 水筒ホルダー; その他
th: คุณลักษณะการจัดเก็บสำหรับกระเป๋า/เคส: ตัวแบ่งช่องแบบปรับได้; ที่วางคันธนู; มีช่องเก็บของในตัว; มีช่องโปร่งใส; ปลอกยางยืด; กระเป๋าที่ด้านนอก; ตาข่ายกันเสื้อผ้า; ใส่อุปกรณ์อาบน้ำแบบแขวน; กระเป๋าเก็บของมีค่า; ช่องใส่ขวดแบบหุ้มฉนวน; ที่ใส่พวงกุญแจ; ช่องใส่แล็ปท็อป; ถุงไม้กล้อง; ซองใส่ป้องกัน; ถุงแบบถอดได้; ช่องใส่โน้ตเพลง; ช่องเดี่ยว; ที่ใส่ขวดน้ำ; อื่นๆ
pl: Funkcje przechowywania torby/obudowy: Regulowane przegrody; Uchwyty na łuki; Wbudowane przegrody; Przezroczyste okno; Pętle elastyczne; Kieszenie zewnętrzne; Siatka na ubrania; Wiszące przybory toaletowe; Ukryte kieszenie; Izolowana kieszeń na butelki; Uchwyt na brelok; Kieszeń na laptop; Uchwyty na młotek; Nakładki ochronne; Wyjmowana saszetka; Kieszeń na nuty; Pojedyncza komora; Uchwyt na butelkę z wodą; Inne
cs: Vlastnosti ukládání tašky/pouzdra: Nastavitelné přepážky; Držáky luků; Vestavěné přihrádky; Průhledné okénko; Elastická poutka; Vnější kapsy; Síťka na oděvy; Závěs na toaletní potřeby; Skryté kapsy; Izolované kapsy na láhve; Držák na klíče; Přihrádka na notebook; Držáky na paličky; Ochranné návleky; Odnímatelné pouzdro; Kapsa na noty; Jedna přihrádka; Držák na láhev; Jiné
lt-LT: Krepšio / lagamino daiktų laikymo funkcijos: Reguliuojami skirtukai; Kaspinų laikikliai; Įmontuoti skyreliai; Permatomas langelis; Elastingos kilpos; Išorinės kišenės; Drabužių tinklelis; Pakabinami, skirti tualeto reikmenims; Paslėptos kišenės; Izoliuota buteliuko kišenė; Laikiklis raktų pakabukui; Nešiojamojo kompiuterio skyrius; Lazdelių laikikliai; Apsauginės movos; Nuimama piniginė; Natų kišenėlė; Vienas skyrius; Vandens buteliuko laikiklis; Kita
da: Opbevaringsfunktioner for taske/etui: Justerbare opdelere; Sløjfeholdere; Indbyggede rum; Klart vindue; Elastiske løkker; Udvendige lommer; Tøjnet; Toilettaske med ophæng; Skjulte lommer; Isoleret flaskelomme; Nøgleringholder; Laptoprum; Kølleholdere; Beskyttende ærmer; Aftagelig pose; Lomme til nodeark; Enkelt rum; Vandflaskeholder; Andet